Hawaii statutes.
§385-6 Requirements for eligibility.
An unemployed claimant is eligible to receive additional unemployment benefits
with respect to any week only if the director of labor and industrial relations
finds that:

(1) The claimant has made a claim for additional
unemployment benefits with respect to that week in accordance with the rules as
the director may prescribe with respect to claims for normal benefits;

(2) The claimant meets the eligibility requirements
of section 383-29(a)(2) and (3);

(3) The claimant is not subject to disqualification
and is not under disqualification for normal benefits under section 383-30;

(4) The claimant is not entitled to receive
unemployment compensation benefits under any state or federal unemployment
compensation laws for the week in which the claimant claims for additional
unemployment benefits;

(5) The claimant is not entitled to receive disaster
benefits under any state or federal law for the week in which the claimant
claims additional unemployment benefits. [L 1961, c 157, pt of §1; Supp,
§93B-7; HRS §385-6; am L 1972, c 47, §3; am L 1982, c 20, §6; gen ch 1985; am L
2015, c 35, §15]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next